Washington statutes.
RCW 11.28.131

Hearing on petition—Appointment—Issuance of letters—Notice to surviving spouse or surviving domestic partner.

When a petition for general letters of administration or for letters of administration with the will annexed shall be filed, the matter may be heard forthwith, appointment made and letters of administration issued: PROVIDED, That if there be a surviving spouse or surviving domestic partner and a petition is presented by anyone other than the surviving spouse or surviving domestic partner, or any person designated by the surviving spouse or surviving domestic partner to serve as personal representative on his or her behalf, notice to the surviving spouse or surviving domestic partner shall be given of the time and place of such hearing at least ten days before the hearing, unless the surviving spouse or surviving domestic partner shall waive notice of the hearing in writing filed in the cause.

[ 2008 c 6 s 914; 1974 ex.s. c 117 s 44.]

NOTES:

Part headings not law—Severability—2008 c 6: See RCW 26.60.900 and 26.60.901.

Application, construction—Severability—Effective date—1974 ex.s. c 117: See RCW 11.02.080 and notes following.